Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.1308

Merger authorized.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, by complying with this section and RCW 23.100.1309 through 23.100.1313:

(a) One or more domestic limited cooperative associations may merge with one or more domestic cooperative associations organized under this chapter or chapter 23.86 or 24.06 RCW or with one or more foreign cooperative associations into a domestic surviving cooperative association or foreign surviving cooperative association; and

(b) Two or more foreign cooperative associations may merge into a domestic limited cooperative association.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, by complying with the provisions of this section and RCW 23.100.1309 through 23.100.1313 applicable to foreign cooperative associations, a foreign cooperative association may be a party to a merger under this section and RCW 23.100.1309 through 23.100.1313 or may be the surviving entity in such a merger if the merger is authorized by the law of the foreign entity's jurisdiction of formation.

[ 2019 c 37 s 1308.]